Colorado, session 2026A, SB051.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) The state of Colorado has established a comprehensive
framework for consumer data privacy through the enactment of the
"Colorado Privacy Act", part 13 of article 1 of title 6, Colorado Revised
Statutes, which recognizes that the personal data of minors requires
heightened protections;
(b) Under the "Colorado Privacy Act", controllers that process the
personal data of minors are subject to additional obligations, including
heightened duties related to data processing, targeted advertising, and
profiling;
(c) In practice, many applications and online services lack reliable
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

information about whether a user is a minor, which limits their ability to
comply with these legal obligations and to implement appropriate
safeguards;
(d) As a result, minors may be exposed to harmful design features
or the collection and use of personal data in ways that are inconsistent with
the protections contemplated by Colorado law; and
(e) A mechanism that allows a computing device to provide a
minimal age-category signal to applications can enable compliance with
these obligations while minimizing the collection and retention of personal
data.
(2) Therefore, with this act, the general assembly intends to establish
a framework for age attestation that enables age-appropriate protections
while preserving user choice and appropriate parental involvement and
avoiding the need for invasive identity verification methods.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add article 30 to title
6 as follows:
ARTICLE 30
Age Attestation for Online Users
6-30-101. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS ARTICLE 30, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(1) "ACCOUNT" MEANS A USER ACCOUNT THAT CONNECTS AN
OPERATING SYSTEM TO A COVERED APPLICATION STORE.
(2) (a) "ACCOUNT HOLDER" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL IN THE STATE
WHO IS AT LEAST EIGHTEEN YEARS OLD, OR THE PARENT OR LEGAL
GUARDIAN OF A USER WHO IS A MINOR, AND WHO ESTABLISHES AN ACCOUNT
ON A DEVICE.
(b) "ACCOUNT HOLDER" DOES NOT INCLUDE A PARENT OF AN
EMANCIPATED MINOR WHO IS A USER OF A DEVICE.
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-051

(3) "AGE-BRACKET DATA" MEANS NONPERSONALLY IDENTIFIABLE
DATA DERIVED FROM A USER'S BIRTH DATE OR AGE FOR THE PURPOSE OF
SHARING WITH COVERED APPLICATIONS, WHICH DATA INDICATES THE USER'S
AGE RANGE, INCLUDING, AT A MINIMUM, DATA THAT INDICATES WHETHER A
USER IS:
(a) UNDER THIRTEEN YEARS OLD;
(b) THIRTEEN YEARS OLD OR OLDER BUT UNDER SIXTEEN YEARS OLD;
(c) SIXTEEN YEARS OLD OR OLDER BUT UNDER EIGHTEEN YEARS OLD;
OR
(d) EIGHTEEN YEARS OLD OR OLDER.
(4) "AGE SIGNAL" MEANS AGE-BRACKET DATA SENT THROUGH A
REAL-TIME SECURE APPLICATION PROGRAMMING INTERFACE FROM AN
OPERATING SYSTEM OR COVERED APPLICATION STORE TO A COVERED
APPLICATION.
(5) (a) "COVERED APPLICATION" MEANS A CONSUMER SOFTWARE
APPLICATION THAT IS ACCESSED THROUGH A COVERED APPLICATION STORE
AND THAT MAY BE RUN OR DIRECTED BY A USER ON A DEVICE.
(b) "COVERED APPLICATION" DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) A SOFTWARE APPLICATION THAT DOES NOT PROCESS USERS'
PERSONAL DATA; OR
(II) AN APPLICATION FROM A FREE, PUBLICLY AVAILABLE CODE
REPOSITORY.
(6) (a) "COVERED APPLICATION STORE" MEANS A PUBLICLY
AVAILABLE INTERNET WEBSITE, SOFTWARE APPLICATION, ONLINE SERVICE,
OR PLATFORM THAT DISTRIBUTES AND FACILITATES, ON A COMMERCIAL
BASIS, THE DOWNLOAD OF APPLICATIONS FROM THIRD-PARTY DEVELOPERS
TO USERS OF DEVICES.
(b) "COVERED APPLICATION STORE" DOES NOT INCLUDE:
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-051

(I) A CODE REPOSITORY PROVIDER;
(II) A CONTAINERIZED SOFTWARE DISTRIBUTION; OR
(III) AN ONLINE SERVICE OR PLATFORM THAT DISTRIBUTES ANY OF
THE FOLLOWING APPLICATIONS IF THE APPLICATION RUNS EXCLUSIVELY
WITHIN A SEPARATE HOST APPLICATION:
(A) AN EXTENSION;
(B) A PLUG-IN;
(C) AN ADD-ON; OR
(D) ANY OTHER SOFTWARE APPLICATION.
(7) "DEVELOPER" MEANS A PERSON THAT WRITES, CREATES,
MAINTAINS, OR CONTROLS A COVERED APPLICATION.
(8) "DEVICE" MEANS A COMPUTER, MOBILE DEVICE, OR SIMILAR
GENERAL-PURPOSE COMPUTING DEVICE THAT IS INTENDED FOR USE BY A
CONSUMER.
(9) "FAMILY ACCOUNT APPLICATION" MEANS A COVERED
APPLICATION THAT:
(a) OFFERS SUBACCOUNTS OR PROFILES WITHIN THE APPLICATION;
(b) REQUIRES A PAID SUBSCRIPTION OR ACCOUNT CREATION WITH
PAYMENT METHOD VERIFICATION AS THE APPLICATION'S PRIMARY BUSINESS
MODEL;
(c) DOES NOT PERMIT ACCOUNT CREATION BY MINORS; AND
(d) VERIFIES THAT THE PRIMARY ACCOUNT HOLDER FOR THE
APPLICATION IS OVER THE AGE OF EIGHTEEN YEARS OLD USING
COMMERCIALLY REASONABLE AGE ESTIMATION METHODS.
(10) "MINOR" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS UNDER EIGHTEEN
YEARS OLD.
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-051

(11) "OPERATING SYSTEM PROVIDER" MEANS A PERSON THAT
DEVELOPS, LICENSES, OR CONTROLS THE OPERATING SYSTEM SOFTWARE ON
A DEVICE.
(12) "PERSONAL DATA" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
6-1-1303 (17).
(13) "PROCESS" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION 6-1-1303
(18).
(14) "USER" MEANS THE PRIMARY USER OF A DEVICE.
6-30-102. Requirements for operating system providers and
developers.
(1) ON AND AFTER JULY 1, 2028, AN OPERATING SYSTEM PROVIDER
THAT OPERATES A COVERED APPLICATION STORE OR MAKES A COVERED
APPLICATION STORE AVAILABLE PRE-INSTALLED ON AN OPERATING SYSTEM
SHALL PROVIDE AN ACCESSIBLE INTERFACE AT ACCOUNT SETUP THAT
REQUIRES AN ACCOUNT HOLDER TO INDICATE THE BIRTH DATE, AGE, OR AGE
BRACKET OF THE USER OF THAT DEVICE FOR THE PURPOSE OF PROVIDING AN
AGE SIGNAL TO COVERED APPLICATIONS AVAILABLE IN THE OPERATING
SYSTEM PROVIDER'S COVERED APPLICATION STORE. OPERATING SYSTEM
PROVIDERS MAY MINIMIZE THE USE OF PERSONAL DATA BY ALLOWING AN
ACCOUNT HOLDER TO SELECT AN AGE BRACKET FOR A USER WHO IS
EIGHTEEN YEARS OLD OR OLDER WITHOUT PROVIDING A BIRTH DATE OR AGE.
(2) ON AND AFTER JULY 1, 2028, AN OPERATING SYSTEM PROVIDER
OR A COVERED APPLICATION STORE SHALL:
(a) PROVIDE DEVELOPERS WITH A REASONABLY CONSISTENT,
REAL-TIME APPLICATION PROGRAMMING INTERFACE TO REQUEST AND
RECEIVE AN AGE SIGNAL; AND
(b) SEND ONLY THE MINIMUM AMOUNT OF INFORMATION NECESSARY
TO COMPLY WITH THIS ARTICLE 30. AN OPERATING SYSTEM PROVIDER OR
COVERED APPLICATION STORE SHALL NOT SHARE AN AGE SIGNAL WITH A
THIRD PARTY FOR A PURPOSE NOT REQUIRED BY THIS ARTICLE 30.
(3) (a) A COVERED APPLICATION MUST USE THE APPLICATION
PAGE 5-SENATE BILL 26-051

PROGRAMMING INTERFACE PROVIDED BY THE OPERATING SYSTEM PROVIDER
OR COVERED APPLICATION STORE TO:
(I) REQUEST AN AGE SIGNAL WITH RESPECT TO A PARTICULAR USER
WHEN THE APPLICATION IS INITIALLY LAUNCHED OR WHEN A USER FIRST
CREATES AN ACCOUNT ON THE COVERED APPLICATION; AND
(II) REQUEST A USER'S AGE BRACKET DATA, AS NEEDED, TO UPDATE
THE AGE INFORMATION HELD BY THE APPLICATION.
(b) (I) A COVERED APPLICATION THAT RECEIVES AN AGE SIGNAL IS
DEEMED TO HAVE KNOWLEDGE OF THE AGE RANGE OF THE USER TO WHOM
THE SIGNAL PERTAINS ACROSS ALL PLATFORMS AND POINTS OF ACCESS OF
THE COVERED APPLICATION.
(II) A DEVELOPER SHALL NOT WILLFULLY DISREGARD CLEAR AND
CONVINCING INFORMATION THAT INDICATES THAT A USER'S AGE IS
DIFFERENT THAN THE AGE-BRACKET DATA INDICATED BY AN AGE SIGNAL
PROVIDED BY AN OPERATING SYSTEM PROVIDER OR BY A COVERED
APPLICATION STORE.
(III) IF A DEVELOPER HAS CLEAR AND CONVINCING INFORMATION
THAT A USER'S AGE IS DIFFERENT THAN THE AGE INDICATED BY AN AGE
SIGNAL RECEIVED PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 30, THE DEVELOPER SHALL
USE THAT INFORMATION AS THE PRIMARY INDICATOR OF THE USER'S AGE.
(IV) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTIONS (3)(b)(II) AND (3)(b)(III)
OF THIS SECTION, A DEVELOPER SHALL TREAT AN AGE SIGNAL RECEIVED
PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 30 AS THE PRIMARY INDICATOR OF A USER'S AGE
RANGE.
(V) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION REQUIRES A DEVELOPER TO ACQUIRE
AGE-RELATED DATA OTHER THAN AN AGE SIGNAL.
(c) A DEVELOPER SHALL ENSURE THAT A COVERED APPLICATION
THAT RECEIVES AN AGE SIGNAL PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 30 USES THE AGE
SIGNAL ONLY TO COMPLY WITH APPLICABLE LAW.
(d) A DEVELOPER SHALL ENSURE THAT A COVERED APPLICATION
THAT RECEIVES AN AGE SIGNAL PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 30 DOES NOT:
PAGE 6-SENATE BILL 26-051

(I) REQUEST MORE INFORMATION CONCERNING THE USER FROM AN
OPERATING SYSTEM PROVIDER OR A COVERED APPLICATION STORE THAN THE
MINIMUM AMOUNT OF INFORMATION NECESSARY TO COMPLY WITH THIS
ARTICLE 30; OR
(II) COMMUNICATE THE AGE SIGNAL TO A THIRD PARTY FOR A
PURPOSE NOT REQUIRED BY THIS ARTICLE 30.
(e) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTIONS (3)(a), (3)(b)(I), AND
(3)(b)(IV) OF THIS SECTION, A DEVELOPER OF A FAMILY ACCOUNT
APPLICATION MAY:
(I) USE THE AGE OF THE PRIMARY ACCOUNT HOLDER OF A FAMILY
ACCOUNT APPLICATION AS THE AGE OF A USER FOR PURPOSES OF APPLYING
AGE-RELATED SAFETY DEFAULTS AND ACCESS TO FEATURES WITHIN THE
FAMILY ACCOUNT APPLICATION; AND
(II) ALLOW THE PRIMARY ACCOUNT HOLDER OF A FAMILY ACCOUNT
APPLICATION TO ATTEST TO THE AGE OF THE USERS OF SUBACCOUNTS OF THE
FAMILY ACCOUNT APPLICATION.
6-30-103. Applicability to existing devices.
(1) WITH RESPECT TO A DEVICE FOR WHICH ACCOUNT SETUP WAS
COMPLETED BEFORE JULY 1, 2028, AN OPERATING SYSTEM PROVIDER SHALL
PROVIDE, BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2029, AN ACCESSIBLE INTERFACE THAT
ALLOWS AN ACCOUNT HOLDER TO INDICATE THE BIRTH DATE OR AGE OF THE
USER OF THAT DEVICE FOR THE PURPOSE OF PROVIDING AN AGE SIGNAL
REGARDING THE USER'S AGE-BRACKET DATA TO COVERED APPLICATIONS
AVAILABLE IN THE OPERATING SYSTEM PROVIDER'S COVERED APPLICATION
STORE.
(2) IF A COVERED APPLICATION LAST UPDATED ON OR AFTER JULY 1,
2027, WAS DOWNLOADED TO A DEVICE BEFORE JULY 1, 2028, AND THE
COVERED APPLICATION HAS NOT REQUESTED AN AGE SIGNAL WITH RESPECT
TO THE USER OF THE DEVICE ON WHICH THE COVERED APPLICATION WAS
DOWNLOADED, THE COVERED APPLICATION MUST REQUEST AN AGE SIGNAL
FROM THE COVERED APPLICATION STORE FROM WHICH THE COVERED
APPLICATION WAS DOWNLOADED WITH RESPECT TO THAT USER BEFORE
JANUARY 1, 2029.
PAGE 7-SENATE BILL 26-051

6-30-104. Enforcement - penalties.
(1) A PERSON THAT VIOLATES THIS ARTICLE 30 SHALL PAY A CIVIL
PENALTY OF NO MORE THAN TWO THOUSAND FIVE HUNDRED DOLLARS FOR
EACH MINOR HARMED BY EACH NEGLIGENT VIOLATION OR NO MORE THAN
SEVEN THOUSAND FIVE HUNDRED DOLLARS FOR EACH MINOR HARMED BY
EACH INTENTIONAL VIOLATION. THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL ASSESS AND
RECOVER THE PENALTY IN A CIVIL ACTION.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION, IF AN
OPERATING SYSTEM PROVIDER OR A COVERED APPLICATION STORE MAKES A
GOOD FAITH EFFORT TO COMPLY WITH THIS ARTICLE 30, TAKING INTO
CONSIDERATION AVAILABLE TECHNOLOGY AND ANY REASONABLE
TECHNICAL LIMITATIONS OR OUTAGES, THE OPERATING SYSTEM PROVIDER
OR COVERED APPLICATION STORE IS NOT LIABLE FOR AN ERRONEOUS AGE
SIGNAL INDICATING A USER'S AGE RANGE OR FOR CONDUCT BY A COVERED
APPLICATION THAT RECEIVES AN AGE SIGNAL INDICATING A USER'S AGE
RANGE.
6-30-105. Applicability - limitations.
(1) THIS ARTICLE 30 DOES NOT:
(a) MODIFY, IMPAIR, OR SUPERSEDE ANY ANTITRUST LAW, INCLUDING
THE "COLORADO STATE ANTITRUST ACT OF 2023", ARTICLE 4 OF THIS TITLE
6; OR
(b) REQUIRE THE COLLECTION OF ADDITIONAL PERSONAL DATA FROM
DEVICE OWNERS OR DEVICE USERS THAT IS NOT NECESSARY TO COMPLY WITH
THIS ARTICLE 30.
(2) AN OPERATING SYSTEM PROVIDER OR COVERED APPLICATION
STORE SHALL NOT DISCRIMINATE IN COMPLYING WITH THIS ARTICLE 30.
DISCRIMINATION IN COMPLYING WITH THIS ARTICLE 30 INCLUDES:
(a) IMPOSING LESS STRINGENT RESTRICTIONS AND OBLIGATIONS ON
ITS OWN APPLICATIONS AND APPLICATION DISTRIBUTION THAN IT DOES ON
THOSE FROM THIRD-PARTY APPLICATIONS OR APPLICATION DISTRIBUTORS;
OR
PAGE 8-SENATE BILL 26-051

(b) USING NONPUBLICLY AVAILABLE DATA COLLECTED FROM A
THIRD PARTY IN THE COURSE OF COMPLIANCE WITH THIS ARTICLE 30 TO
COMPETE AGAINST THAT THIRD PARTY, GIVE THE COVERED APPLICATION
STORE'S SERVICES PREFERENCE RELATIVE TO THOSE OF A THIRD PARTY, OR
USE THE NONPUBLICLY AVAILABLE DATA IN AN ANTICOMPETITIVE MANNER
IN VIOLATION OF APPLICABLE LAW.
(3) THIS ARTICLE 30 DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(a) A BROADBAND INTERNET ACCESS SERVICE, AS DEFINED IN
SECTION 40-15-209 (4)(a);
(b) A TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICE, AS DEFINED IN 47 U.S.C. SEC.
153 (53);
(c) THE DELIVERY OF OR USE OF A PHYSICAL PRODUCT;
(d) DATA MAINTAINED BY A STATE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
EDUCATION, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 23-18-102 (10), THE STATE, A
SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE , THE JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT OF THE STATE, OR
A COUNTY, CITY AND COUNTY, OR MUNICIPALITY IF THE DATA IS COLLECTED,
MAINTAINED, DISCLOSED, COMMUNICATED, AND USED AS AUTHORIZED BY
STATE AND FEDERAL LAW FOR NONCOMMERCIAL PURPOSES; OR
(e) AN OPERATING SYSTEM PROVIDER OR DEVELOPER THAT
DISTRIBUTES AN OPERATING SYSTEM OR APPLICATION UNDER LICENSE TERMS
THAT PERMIT A RECIPIENT TO COPY, REDISTRIBUTE, AND MODIFY THE
SOFTWARE WITHOUT ANY PLATFORM-IMPOSED TECHNICAL OR CONTRACTUAL
RESTRICTIONS IMPOSED BY THE PROVIDER OR DEVELOPER ON INSTALLING
ALL MODIFIED VERSIONS.
(4) THIS ARTICLE 30 DOES NOT IMPOSE LIABILITY THAT ARISES FROM
THE USE OF A DEVICE OR APPLICATION BY AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS NOT THE
USER TO WHOM AN AGE SIGNAL PERTAINS ON AN OPERATING SYSTEM
PROVIDER, A COVERED APPLICATION STORE, OR A DEVELOPER.
(5) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THIS ARTICLE 30 TO THE
CONTRARY, THIS ARTICLE 30 DOES NOT APPLY TO A DEVELOPER IF THE
PREDOMINANT OR EXCLUSIVE FUNCTION OF THE COVERED APPLICATION THAT
THE DEVELOPER WRITES, CREATES, MAINTAINS, OR CONTROLS IS:
PAGE 9-SENATE BILL 26-051

(a) FACILITATING COMMUNICATION WITHIN A BUSINESS OR AN
ENTERPRISE AMONG EMPLOYEES OR AFFILIATES OF THE BUSINESS OR
ENTERPRISE, SO LONG AS ACCESS TO THE COVERED APPLICATION IS
RESTRICTED TO EMPLOYEES OR AFFILIATES OF THE BUSINESS OR ENTERPRISE;
(b) PROVIDING ENTERPRISE SOFTWARE FUNCTIONS USED BY
BUSINESSES, GOVERNMENTS, OR NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS; OR
(c) PROVIDING OR OBTAINING TECHNICAL SUPPORT FOR A SOFTWARE
PLATFORM, PRODUCT, OR SERVICE.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect July 1, 2028; except that, if a referendum petition is filed
pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state constitution against this act
or an item, section, or part of this act within the ninety-day period after final
adjournment of the general assembly, then the act, item, section, or part will
PAGE 10-SENATE BILL 26-051

not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election to be
held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect July 1, 2028.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 11-SENATE BILL 26-051